West Virginia, session 2025, HB2323.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Registered Nurses. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-7-4 of this code, relating to the Board of Registered Nurses (requirements for registration and licensure and conduct constituting professional misconduct, 19 CSR 03), is authorized.